Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3408
Sections; when applicable.

Sections 44-3401 to 44-3408 applies to all policies filed on or after June 30, 1981. No policy shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after June 30, 1984, unless approved by the director or permitted to be issued under sections 44-3401 to 44-3408. Any policy which has been approved or permitted to be issued before June 30, 1984, and which meets the standards set by sections 44-3401 to 44-3408, need not be refiled for approval, but may continue to be lawfully delivered or issued for delivery in this state upon the filing with the director of a list of such policies identified by policy number and accompanied by a certificate as to each such policy in the manner provided in section 44-3405.

Laws 1979, LB 415, § 8.